Utah statutes.
41-3-303.   Temporary permits -- Inspections required before issuance.
(1)  A dealer licensed in accordance with this chapter may not issue a
temporary permit under Section 41-3-302 unless:
(a) (i)  the motor vehicle for which the temporary permit is issued has
received and passed the safety inspection required by Section 53-8-205 within
the previous six months;
(ii)  the safety inspection certificate was issued in the name of a licensed
and bonded dealer; and
(iii)  a copy of the safety inspection certificate is given to the customer;
and
(b)  the motor vehicle passed the emission inspection test required by Section
41-6a-1642.
(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(a), a dealer may issue a temporary permit
without a safety inspection certificate if the motor vehicle complies with the
safety inspection as provided in Section 41-1a-205.
(3)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(b), a dealer may issue a temporary permit
without proof of an emission inspection if:
(a)  the motor vehicle is exempt from emission inspection as provided in
Section 41-6a-1642;
(b)  the purchaser is a resident of a county that does not require emission
inspections; or
(c)  the motor vehicle is otherwise exempt from emission inspections.
(4)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), a dealer may sell a motor vehicle as is
without having it safety or emission inspected provided that no temporary
permit is issued.
